New Jersey, session 221, A5170.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1[1. Section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263) is amended to read as follows: 89. a. The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in paragraphs (1) through (5) or paragraphs (7) through (12) of subsection b. of this section, and shall purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in paragraphs (6) and (13) of subsection b. of this section, including tax credit transfer certificates issued by the director in lieu of a tax credit allowed under such programs.  The director shall not pay consideration in excess of 75 percent of the credit amount to be purchased, except for a credit awarded under: (1)  the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), which shall be subject to the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection d. of section 77 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-345); (2)  the New Jersey Aspire Program Act, sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335), as amended and supplemented, for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director, and further provided that, if the application to the director is submitted after the sixth year of the eligibility period, the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment that the developer is required to pay pursuant to subsection c. of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328) shall increase to 50 percent; or (3)  the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director. b.    The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may or shall, subject to the provisions of subsection a. of this section, purchase tax credits awarded under the following: (1)  the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections [1] 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 ([C.34:1B-269] C.34:1B-270 through C.34:1B-276); (2)  the "Brownfield Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287); (3)  the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through C.34:1B-302); (4)  the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through C.34:1B-310); (5)  the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through C.34:1B-321); (6)  the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335); (7)  the " Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); (8)  the Grow New Jersey Assistance Program established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-244); (9)  section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4); (10) the State Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grant program established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489e); (11) section 1 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b); [and] (12) section 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54A:4-12b); and (13) the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.). (cf: P.L.2020, c.156, s.89)]1 11.  Section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263) is amended to read as follows: 89. a. The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in paragraphs (1) through (5) or paragraphs (7) through (12) of subsection b. of this section, and shall purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in paragraphs (6) and (13) of subsection b. of this section, including tax credit transfer certificates issued by the director in lieu of a tax credit allowed under such programs.  The director shall not pay consideration in excess of 75 percent of the credit amount to be purchased, except for a credit awarded under: (1) the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), which shall be subject to the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection d. of section 77 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-345); (2) the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335), as amended and supplemented, for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director, and further provided that, if the application to the director is submitted after the sixth year of the eligibility period, the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment that the developer is required to pay pursuant to subsection c. of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328) shall increase to 50 percent; or (3) the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director. b.   The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may or shall, subject to the provisions of subsection a. of this section, purchase tax credits awarded under the following: (1) the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through C.34:1B-276); (2) the "Brownfield Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287); (3) the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through C.34:1B-302); (4) the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through C.34:1B-310); (5) the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through C.34:1B-321); (6) the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335); (7) the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); (8) the Grow New Jersey Assistance Program established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-244); (9) section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4); (10) the State Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grant program established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489e); (11) section 1 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b); (12) section 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54A:4-12b); and (13) the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.).1 (cf: P.L.2025, c.2, s.9) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.